Washington statutes.
RCW 19.52.160

Chapter not applicable to mobile homes.

This chapter shall not apply to the financing of mobile homes which meets the definition of real property contained in RCW 84.04.090, and which financing is insured by a federal instrumentality.

[ 1985 c 395 s 6.]